New York, session 2025-2026, A9508.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraphs (B) and (D) of paragraph (1) of subsection 2 (d) of section 2131 of the insurance law, as amended by a chapter of the 3 laws of 2025 amending the general business law and the insurance law 4 relating to requiring peer-to-peer car sharing programs provide certain 5 insurance coverage, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 5941-B 6 and A. 6576-B, are amended to read as follows: 7 (B) accident and health insurance that provides coverage to renters 8 and other vehicle occupants, or that provides coverage to shared vehicle 9 owners, shared vehicle drivers, or a combination thereof, in excess to 10 the standard first party benefits provided pursuant to article fifty-one 11 of this chapter, for accidental death and/or dismemberment and for 12 medical expenses resulting from an accident that occurs during the 13 rental period or during the peer-to-peer car sharing period; 14 (D) any other coverage that the superintendent may approve as meaning- 15 ful and appropriate in connection with the rental of motor vehicles or 16 the sharing of a shared vehicle; or 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 18 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the general business 19 law and the insurance law relating to requiring peer-to-peer car sharing 20 programs provide certain insurance coverage, as proposed in legislative 21 bills numbers S. 5941-B and A. 6576-B, takes effect. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10425-10-6